Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.730 is amended to read:
163.730. As used in ORS 30.866 and 163.730 to 163.750, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alarm” means to cause apprehension or fear resulting from the perception of danger.
(2) “Coerce” means to restrain, compel or dominate by force or threat.
(3) “Contact” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Coming into the visual or physical presence of the other person;
(b) Following the other person;
(c) Waiting outside the home, property, place of work or school of  the other person or of a
member of that person’s family or household;
(d) Sending or making written or electronic communications in any form to the other person;
(e) Speaking with the other person by any means;
(f) Communicating with the other person through a third person;
(g) Committing a crime against the other person;
(h) Communicating with a third person who has some relationship to the other person  with the
intent of affecting the third person’s relationship with the other person;
(i) Communicating with business entities with the intent of affecting some right or interest  of
the other person;
(j) Damaging the other person’s home, property, place of work or school;
(k) Delivering directly or through a  third person any object to the home, property, place of work
or school of the other person; [ or]
(L) Service of process  or other legal documents unless the other person is served as provided
in ORCP 7 or 9[ .];
(m) Obtaining, possessing, transferring, creating, uttering or converting to the  person’s
own use the personal identification of the other person;
(n) Disclosing an image of the other  person, whose intimate parts are visible or who is
engaged in sexual conduct, without the consent of the other person;
Enrolled House Bill 4156 (HB 4156-B) Page 1
(o) The use of an  electronic service, application, device or other electronic means to ob-
tain, monitor or interfere with the location, communication or activities  of the other person,
without the consent of the other person; or
(p) Causing a third person  to harass, humiliate or injure the other person by disclosing
the other person’s name, image or  personal information, as that term is defined in ORS
30.835, without the consent of the other person.
(4) “Disclose” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.472.
[(4)] (5) “Household member” means any person residing in the same residence as the victim.
[(5)] (6) “Immediate family” means father, mother, child, sibling, spouse, grandparent, stepparent
and stepchild.
[(6)] (7) “Law enforcement officer” means:
(a) A person employed in this state as a police officer by:
(A) A county sheriff, constable or marshal;
(B) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125; or
(C) A municipal or state police agency; or
(b) An authorized tribal police officer as defined in ORS 181A.940.
(8) “Personal identification” has the meaning given that term in ORS 165.800.
[(7)] (9) “Repeated” means two or more times.
[(8)] (10) “School” means a public or private institution of learning or a child care facility.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 163.732 is amended to read:
163.732. (1) A person commits the crime of stalking if:
(a) The person knowingly alarms  or coerces another person or a member of that person’s im-
mediate family or household by engaging in repeated and unwanted contact with the other person;
(b) It is objectively reasonable for a person in the victim’s situation to have been alarmed  or
coerced by the contact; and
(c) The repeated and unwanted contact causes  the victim reasonable apprehension regarding the
personal safety of the victim or a member of the victim’s immediate family or household.
(2)(a) Stalking is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, stalking is a Class C felony if :
(A) The person has a prior conviction for:
[(A)] (i) Stalking , or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction ; or
[(B)] (ii)  Violating a court’s stalking protective order[ .], or an  equivalent crime in another
jurisdiction;
(B) The person is the respondent for an active protection order  in any jurisdiction that
restrains the person from  stalking, intimidating, molesting or menacing another person, and
the person protected by the order is not the victim of the current offense; or
(C) At least one instance of unwanted  contact is the commission of the following against
the victim:
(i) A felony;
(ii) Unlawful dissemination of an intimate image under ORS 163.472; or
(iii) Unlawful use of a global positioning system device under ORS 163.715.
(c) When stalking is a Class C felony pursuant to paragraph (b) of this  subsection, stalking shall
be classified as a person felony and as crime category 8 of the sentencing guidelines  grid of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 163.750 is amended to read:
163.750. (1) A person commits the crime of violating a court’s stalking  protective order [ when]
if:
(a) The person has been served with a court’s stalking protective order as  provided in ORS
30.866 or 163.738, or [ if further ] service was waived under ORS 163.741 because the person appeared
before the court;
(b) The person, subsequent to the service of the order  or the  waiver of service , has engaged
intentionally, knowingly or recklessly in conduct prohibited by the order; and
Enrolled House Bill 4156 (HB 4156-B) Page 2
(c) If the conduct is  prohibited contact as defined in ORS 163.730 (3)(d), (e), (f), (h) or (i), the
subsequent conduct has created  reasonable apprehension regarding the personal safety of a person
protected by the order.
(2)(a) Violating a court’s stalking protective order is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, violating a court’s stalking protective or-
der is a Class C felony if :
(A) The person has a prior conviction for:
[(A)] (i) Stalking , or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction ; or
[(B)] (ii)  Violating a court’s  stalking protective order[ .], or an equivalent crime in another
jurisdiction;
(B) The person is the  respondent for an active protection order in any jurisdiction that
restrains the person from  stalking, intimidating, molesting or menacing another person, and
the person protected by that  order is not the same as the person protected by the order at
issue in the current offense; or
(C) At least one instance of unwanted  contact is the commission of the following against
the person protected by the order:
(i) A felony;
(ii) Unlawful dissemination of an intimate image under ORS 163.472; or
(iii) Unlawful use of a global positioning system device under ORS 163.715.
(c) When violating a  court’s stalking protective order is a Class C felony pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection, violating a court’s stalking protective order shall be  classified as a person
felony and as crime category 8 of the sentencing guidelines grid  of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS 163.730, 163.732 and 163.750 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2024 Act apply to offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2024.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act takes effect on July 1, 2024.
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4156 (HB 4156-B) Page 3